Virginia statutes. Title 40.1. Labor and Employment.
Article 2.1. Collective Bargaining for Governmental Employees.

§ 40.1-57.2.
Collective bargaining.

No state, county, city, town, or like governmental officer, agent, or governing body is vested with or possesses any authority to recognize any labor union or other employee association as a bargaining agent of any public officers or employees, or to collectively bargain or enter into any collective bargaining contract with any such union or association or its agents with respect to any matter relating to them or their employment or service unless, in the case of a county, city, or town, such authority is provided for or permitted by a local ordinance or by a resolution. Any such ordinance or resolution shall provide for procedures for the certification and decertification of exclusive bargaining representatives, including reasonable public notice and opportunity for labor organizations to intervene in the process for designating an exclusive representative of a bargaining unit. As used in this section, “county, city, or town” includes any local school board, and “public officers or employees” includes employees of a local school board.

No ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to subsection A shall include provisions that restrict the governing body’s authority to establish the budget or appropriate funds.

For any governing body of a county, city, or town that has not adopted an ordinance or resolution providing for collective bargaining, such governing body shall, within 120 days of receiving certification from a majority of public employees in a unit considered by such employees to be appropriate for the purposes of collective bargaining, take a vote to adopt or not adopt an ordinance or resolution to provide for collective bargaining by such public employees and any other public employees deemed appropriate by the governing body. Nothing in this subsection shall require any governing body to adopt an ordinance or resolution authorizing collective bargaining.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A regarding a local ordinance or resolution granting or permitting collective bargaining, no officer elected pursuant to Article VII, Section 4 of the Constitution of Virginia or any employee of such officer is vested with or possesses any authority to recognize any labor union or other employee association as a bargaining agent of any public officers or employees, or to collectively bargain or enter into any collective bargaining contract with any such union or association or its agents, with respect to any matter relating to them or their employment or service.

History.

1993, cc. 868, 879; 2020, cc. 1209, 1276.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1209 and
1276, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on May 1, 2021.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1209 and 1276, effective May 1, 2021, are identical, and added subsections B through D; and in subsection A, substituted “city, town” for “municipal” in the first sentence and added “unless, in the case of a county, city, or town, such authority is provided for or permitted by a local ordinance or by a resolution” to the end of the first sentence and also added the last two sentences.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Existing policy favors use of arbitration local governments. —

By authorizing local government collective bargaining and the use of arbitration provisions in agreements, and since existing policy favors the use of arbitration by local governments, local governments may include in collective bargaining agreements entered into under §

40.1-57.2

grievance and dispute resolution procedures culminating in final and binding arbitration. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Charniele Herring, Majority Leader, House of Delegates, 21-009, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 4 (3/1/21).

Labor Relations Administrator. —

Local governments may include provisions for a neutral Labor Relations Administrator who can only be terminated prior to the expiration of his or her contract by mutual agreement of the locality’s management and its employee unions in collective bargaining ordinances enacted under §

40.1-57.2

. Local governments may include such provisions whether or not an employee union has been certified. The inclusion of a binding arbitration provision in a collective bargaining ordinance is a reasonable method to resolve negotiation impasses over non-financial issues and does not violate the Dillon Rule. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Jennifer B. Boysko, Member, Senate of Virginia; and The Honorable Suhas Subramanyam, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 21-061/21-071, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (12/10/21)..

Pay raises in collective bargaining agreements. —

Local governments may include provisions in collective bargaining agreements that allow for employee pay raises over a multi-year period. However, these pay raises would remain subject to annual appropriations by the locality, which may or may not appropriate the requisite amount of funds each year. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Paul E. Krizek, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 21-093, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 40 (12/21/21).

§ 40.1-57.3.
Certain activities permitted.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent employees of the Commonwealth, of its political subdivisions, or of any governmental agency of any of them from forming associations for the purpose of promoting their interests before the employing agency and, if they are employees of a county, city, or town or local school board that has, by a local ordinance or resolution as provided in §

40.1-57.2

, authorized its employees to engage in collective bargaining, from doing so as provided in such ordinance or resolution.

History.

1993, cc. 868, 879; 2020, cc. 1209, 1276.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1209 and 1276, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on May 1, 2021.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1209 and 1276, effective May 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “of its political” for “its political” and added “and, if they are employees of a county, city, or town or local school board that has, by a local ordinance or resolution as provided in §

40.1-57.2

, authorized its employees to engage in collective bargaining, from doing so as provided in such ordinance or resolution” at the end.